Wisconsin, session 2025, SB877.
do enact as follows:SB877,11Section 1. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:SB877,2,3266.0443 Local consultation for refugee resettlement and assistance. 3(1) In this section:SB877,2,74(a) “Chief elected official” means the mayor of a city or, if the city is organized 5under subch. I of ch. 64, the president of the council of that city, the village 6president of a village, the town board chairperson of a town, the chairperson of the 7county board of supervisors, or the chairperson of a school board.SB877,2,98(b) “Committee” means a county refugee resettlement committee organized 9under sub. (5).SB877,2,1110(c) “Designee” means a person designated under sub. (4) (b) by a local 11governmental unit.SB877,2,1312(d) “Local governmental unit” means a city, village, town, county, or school 13district.SB877,3,214(e) “Private nonprofit voluntary agency” means an organization that 15participates in the federal reception and placement program under a cooperative 1agreement with the federal department of state to sponsor and provide assistance 2and support to refugees upon arrival in the United States.SB877,3,93(2) If any employee or officer of a local governmental unit contacts or is 4contacted by the federal government or a private nonprofit voluntary agency acting 5under 8 USC 1522 regarding the proposed placement of refugees, as defined in 8 6USC 1101 (a) (42), in the local governmental unit under 8 USC 1522, within 7 7business days of the initial contact, the employee or officer shall submit a written 8report on the contact, including copies of any documentation received, to the chief 9elected official and clerk of the local governmental unit.SB877,3,1410(3) Within 10 business days of receiving a report under sub. (2), a chief elected 11official shall provide a written notification of the contact to the chief elected official 12and clerk of each local governmental unit located, entirely or partially, within a 100-13mile radius of the office of the clerk for the local governmental unit providing the 14notice under this subsection.SB877,3,1715(4) Within 30 days of receiving notification under sub. (3), the governing body 16of each local governmental unit receiving notification under sub. (3) shall meet and 17do all of the following:SB877,3,1918(a) Include on the meeting agenda an informational item that the notification 19under sub. (3) has been received and allow for a public comment on the item.SB877,4,320(b) Designate, by a majority vote of a quorum of the governing body, an 21employee or officer of the local governmental unit to serve as the representative for 22the local governmental unit for purposes of consultation with the federal 23government or a private nonprofit voluntary agency regarding refugee resettlement 1and assistance as set forth under 8 USC 1522. The clerk of the local governmental 2unit shall notify the county board chairperson and clerk for the county in which the 3local governmental unit is located of the designation under this paragraph.SB877,4,124(5) Not sooner than 30 days, nor later than 45 days, after receiving a 5notification under sub. (3), upon the call of the county board chairperson, each 6designee in the county with regard to a report under sub. (2) shall meet to discuss 7the proposed placement of refugees regarding which the report was made. The 8county board chairperson shall ensure that representatives of the federal 9government or private nonprofit voluntary agency involved in the contact under 10sub. (2) are invited to the meeting. Upon commencement of the meeting under this 11subsection, the designees constitute a county refugee resettlement committee. The 12county is responsible for all costs of the committee.SB877,5,813(6) Within 30 days of the initial committee meeting under sub. (5), the 14committee shall hold a public hearing regarding the proposed placement of refugees 15regarding which the report under sub. (2) was made. Notice of the hearing shall be 16given by publishing in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation 17within the territory within a 100-mile radius of the office of the clerk for the local 18governmental unit to whom the report under sub. (2) was made as a class 1 notice, 19under ch. 985, a summary of the proposal and notice of the place where the 20proposal, the written report submitted to the chief elected official under sub. (2), 21and any documentation submitted with the report are available for public 22inspection, and notice of the time and place for holding the public hearing thereon 23in the local governmental unit at least 15 days prior to the time of the public 1hearing. Posting may not be substituted for publication under this subsection. 2Notice of the hearing shall also be given at least 10 days before the meeting by 3communication from the committee to those news media who have filed a written 4request for notice of all meetings of any local governmental unit that received a 5notification under sub. (3), and to the official newspaper designated under ss. 6985.04, 985.05, and 985.06 of any local governmental unit that received a 7notification under sub. (3) or, if none exists, to a news medium likely to give notice in 8the area.SB877,5,129(7) Once a public hearing has been held under sub. (6), the committee shall 10make a recommendation to the governing body of the local governmental unit on 11whether the body should pass a resolution regarding its position on the proposed 12refugee placement.SB877,5,1813(8) The committee shall provide each designee with guidance on all 14considerations that should be included as part of the consultation under 8 USC 151522, including consideration of potential impacts on the local agencies and the 16timeline related to any placement of refugees with regard to which the report under 17sub. (2) was made. Designees shall communicate all considerations provided by the 18committee to the relevant parties involved in consultation under 8 USC 1522.SB877,5,2219(9) Once a plan relating to the proposed refugee placement under this section 20has been established after consultation under 8 USC 1522, each designee shall 21submit within 7 business days a written report on the plan to the local 22governmental unit for which the designee is a representative.SB877,5,2323